Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 50

Economic Council on Women [Repealed]

4-50-101. [Repealed.]

Acts 1998, ch. 1045, § 1; 2012, ch. 616, §§ 2, 3; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 326, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 50, §§4-50-101 —4-50-105, concerned the Tennessee economic council on women.

4-50-102. [Repealed.]

Acts 1998, ch. 1045, § 2; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 326, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 50, §§4-50-101 —4-50-105, concerned the Tennessee economic council on women.

4-50-103. [Repealed.]

Acts 1998, ch. 1045, § 3; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 326, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 50, §§4-50-101 —4-50-105, concerned the Tennessee economic council on women.

4-50-104. [Repealed.]

Acts 1998, ch. 1045, § 4; 2012, ch. 800, § 49; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 326, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 50, §§4-50-101 —4-50-105, concerned the Tennessee economic council on women.

4-50-105. [Repealed.]

Acts 1998, ch. 1045, § 5; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 326, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 50, §§4-50-101 —4-50-105, concerned the Tennessee economic council on women.